District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.02

General prohibitions.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to own, operate, maintain, open, or establish a veterinary facility within the District without first having obtained a license from the Mayor.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person other than a veterinarian licensed in the District to hold a license for a veterinary facility.

(c)

This section shall not apply to a facility or agency operated by the federal government or the District.

History

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184